North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-20.1 Fertilizer and Soil Conditioner Law [Repealed]

19-20.1-01.
Enforcing official. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 18.

19-20.1-02.
Definitions of words and terms. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 3; 1977, ch. 198, § 1; 1985, ch. 258, § 52; 1985, ch. 268, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 228, § 3; 1995, ch. 219, § 33; 1995, ch. 222, § 1; 2013, ch. 187, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-03.
Product registration — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 4; 1977, ch. 198, § 2; 1985, ch. 258, § 53; 1991, ch. 228, § 4; 1995, ch. 219, § 34; 1995, ch. 222, § 2; 2003, ch. 189, § 1; 2011, ch. 35, § 13; 2013, ch. 187, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-03.1.
Distributor’s license — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 198, § 3; 1985, ch. 268, § 3; 1991, ch. 228, § 5; 1995, ch. 219, § 35; 1997, ch. 208, § 4; 2003, ch. 189, § 2; 2011, ch. 35, § 14; 2013, ch. 187, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-03.2.
Proof of effectiveness. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 198, § 4; 1991, ch. 228, § 6; 1995, ch. 219, § 36; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-03.3.
Protected information. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 18.

19-20.1-03.4.
Guaranteed analysis. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 228, § 8; 1995, ch. 219, § 38; 1995, ch. 222, § 3; 2013, ch. 187, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-04.
Label requirement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 5; 1977, ch. 198, § 5; 1991, ch. 228, § 9; 1995, ch. 219, § 39; 2013, ch. 187, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-05.
Labeling soil conditioners. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 198, § 18.

19-20.1-05.1.
Fertilizer in bulk storage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 18.

19-20.1-06.
Inspection fees — Tonnage reports — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 7; 1977, ch. 198, § 6; 1983, ch. 254, § 9; 1985, ch. 258, § 54; 1985, ch. 268, § 4; 1991, ch. 228, § 11; 1993, ch. 224, § 1; 1995, ch. 219, § 40; 1995, ch. 222, § 4; 2003, ch. 189, § 3; 2011, ch. 35, § 15; 2011, ch. 168, § 1; 2013, ch. 187, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-07.
Inspection fees and tonnage reports. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 18.

19-20.1-08.
Inspection, sampling, analysis. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 9; 1977, ch. 198, § 8; 1985, ch. 258, § 55; 1987, ch. 263, § 21; 1991, ch. 228, § 13; 1995, ch. 219, § 42; 2013, ch. 187, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-09.
Minimum plant food content. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 198, § 18.

19-20.1-10.
Misbranding. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 11; 1977, ch. 198, § 9; 1985, ch. 258, § 56; 1985, ch. 268, § 5; 1991, ch. 228, § 14; 1995, ch. 219, § 43; 2013, ch. 187, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-11.
Publications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 12; 1977, ch. 198, § 10; 1979, ch. 292, § 2; 1985, ch. 258, § 57; 1991, ch. 228, § 15; 1995, ch. 219, § 44; 2013, ch. 187, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-12.
Rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 13; 1977, ch. 198, § 11; 1985, ch. 258, § 58; 1991, ch. 228, § 16; 1995, ch. 219, § 45; 2013, ch. 187, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-13.
Deficiencies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 14; 1977, ch. 198, § 12; 1985, ch. 258, § 59; 1991, ch. 228, § 17; 1995, ch. 219, § 46; 1995, ch. 222, § 5; 2013, ch. 187, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-14.
Cancellation of registrations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 15; 1977, ch. 198, § 13; 1985, ch. 258, § 60; 1991, ch. 228, § 18; 1995, ch. 219, § 47; 2013, ch. 187, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-15.
Stop-sale orders. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 16; 1977, ch. 198, § 14; 1985, ch. 258, § 61; 1991, ch. 228, § 19; 1995, ch. 219, § 48; 2013, ch. 187, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-16.
Seizure, condemnation, and sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 17; 1977, ch. 198, § 15; 1985, ch. 258, § 62; 1991, ch. 228, § 20; 1995, ch. 219, § 49; 2013, ch. 187, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-17.
Violations — Criminal penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 18; 1975, ch. 106, § 191; 1977, ch. 198, § 16; 1985, ch. 258, § 63; 1987, ch. 263, § 22; 1991, ch. 228, § 21; 1993, ch. 218, § 5; 1995, ch. 219, § 50; 2013, ch. 187, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-17.1.
Violations — Civil penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.1-18.
Exchanges between manufacturers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 172, § 19; 1977, ch. 198, § 17; 1985, ch. 268, § 6; 1991, ch. 228, § 22; 2013, ch. 187, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.